Washington statutes.
RCW 43.132.810

Local government fiscal notes—Fiscal impact of selected laws on local governments—Biennial report.

The office of financial management, in consultation with the department of commerce, shall prepare a report for the legislature on or before December 31st of every even-numbered year on local government fiscal notes, and reports on the fiscal impacts on local governments arising from selected laws, that were prepared over the preceding two-year period.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2059; 2000 c 182 s 6.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Intent—2000 c 182: See note following RCW 43.132.020.